Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1365.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 56APUBLIC HEALTH NOTIFICATION PROGRAMSSubchapterA. (Reserved)B. Medication-Induced Movement Disorders Screening Education ProgramSUBCHAPTER A(Reserved)SUBCHAPTER BMEDICATION-INDUCED MOVEMENT DISORDERSSCREENING EDUCATION PROGRAM12345678910111213141516171819 Sec.56A21. Definitions.56A22. Medication-Induced Movement Disorders Screening Education Program.56A23. Regulations.§ 56A21. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Medication-induced movement disorders." A range of neurological conditions characterized by involuntary abnormal movements associated with prolonged use of certain medications that are commonly used for the treatment of mental health conditions."Program." The Medication-Induced Movement Disorders Screening Education Program established under section 56A22(a) (relating to Medication-Induced Movement Disorders Screening Education Program).§ 56A22. Medication-Induced Movement Disorders Screening Education Program.(a) Establishment.--The Medication-Induced Movement Disorders Screening Education Program is established in the department.(b) Development.--The department shall develop the program for residents of this Commonwealth in consultation with relevant agencies, including:(1) The Office of Developmental Programs under the Department of Human Services.(2) The Office of Mental Health and Substance Abuse 20250HB1365PN1559 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services under the Department of Human Services.(3) The Department of Aging.(4) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(5) The Bureau of Community Corrections under the Department of Corrections.(c) Components.--The program must include:(1) Educational information on the importance of screening for and identifying symptoms of medication-induced movement disorders associated with prolonged use of certain medications that are commonly used for the treatment of mental health conditions.(2) The development of guidance and educational materials for health care providers on clinical standards and best practices for screening and treating medication-induced movement disorders, including for services provided through telehealth. The guidance shall be:(i) Informed by the American Psychiatric Association and other relevant and current professional society practice guidelines.(ii) Developed in coordination with relevant health care provider groups.(3) Education and outreach on the elimination of stigma for individuals living with medication-induced movement disorders related to the treatment of mental health conditions, including medication-induced movement disorder awareness materials for public safety officers.(d) Electronic informational materials.--The department shall develop electronic informational materials and make available to the public and to health care providers information regarding symptoms of, screenings for and treatment of 20250HB1365PN1559 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medication-induced movement disorders.(e) Dissemination of informational materials.--The department shall:(1) Post the informational materials under subsection (d) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(2) Distribute the guidance and educational information under subsection (c) to health care providers and facilities in this Commonwealth serving populations at high risk of medication-induced movement disorders.§ 56A23. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement and administer this subchapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1365PN1559 - 4 - 1234567891011121314